North Dakota, session 69, HB1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-21-52 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-21-52. Exemption for certain street rod, collector, or special interest motor vehicles.
The provisions of this chapter or chapter 37-12-02 of the North Dakota Administrative Code relating
to bumpers, tires, and fenders do not apply to street rod, collector, or special interest motor vehicles.
However, a street rod, collector, or special interest vehicle must have all equipment, in operating
condition, which was specifically required by law as a condition for its sale when it was first
manufactured. AFor purposes of this section "street rod is, collector, or special interest vehicle" means a
modernized motor vehicle which was manufactured before 1949 by a recognized manufacturer and
which retains the general appearance and original body configuration as manufactured or a motor
vehicle designed and manufactured to resemble such a motor vehicle, which is at least forty years old.
A street rod, collector, or special interest vehicle may have improved modifications to the body, chassis,
engine, brakes, power train, steering, and suspension systems either by modifying the original
equipment or replacing original parts with fabricated parts or those taken from other existing vehicles.
The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

H. B. NO. 1155 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1155.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State